el_el_moderngreek_en_us.aff
SFX 42 Y 3
SFX 42   e     ions       e
SFX 42   y     ications   y
SFX 42   0     ens        [^ey]

SFX 43 Y 4
SFX 43 ώ       ιόσουν  .               # αγαπώ > αγαπιόσουν
SFX 43 όμουν   όσουν   .               # δενόμουν > δενόσουν
SFX 43 ω       ουμε    .               # δένω > δένουμε
SFX 43 η       εων     .               # σκέψη > σκέψεων

SFX 44 Y 1
SFX 44   0     ly         .

SFX 45 Y 3
SFX 45 ώ       ιόταν   .               # αγαπώ > αγαπιόταν
SFX 45 μουν   ταν      όμουν           # δενόμουν > δενόταν
SFX 45 ς      δων      ές              # καφές > καφέδων

SFX 46 Y 4
SFX 46   0     rs         e
SFX 46   y     iers       [^aeiou]y
SFX 46   0     ers        [aeiou]y
SFX 46   0     ers        [^ey]
